Illinois, session 104th, HB3707.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 123D-1 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/123D-1)7    Sec. 123D-1. Purpose; construction. The The purpose of 8this Article is to provide for the organization of and 9issuance of a certificate of authority to nonprofit risk 10organizations that insure nonprofit organizations and that 11will qualify, and continue to qualify, as a qualified 12charitable risk pool, as defined in subsection (n) of Section 13501 of the Internal Revenue Code.14(Source: P.A. 93-918, eff. 1-1-05.)